Hawaii statutes.
§604-17 Courts of record; testimony and
proceedings. The district courts shall be courts of record. The district
courts shall in all cases preserve in writing, on tape, or such other
mechanical device as may be appropriate, the minutes, proceedings, and
testimony of their trials, transactions, and judgments, and the facts upon
which their decisions rest. [L 1892, c 57, §13; RL 1925, §2285; am L 1927, c
71, §1; RL 1935, §3774; RL 1945, §9684; RL 1955, §216-15; HRS §604-17; am L
1970, c 188, §22; am L 1971, c 144, §6E]

Rules of Court

Transcript of proceedings, see DCRCP rule 80(c).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next